Utah statutes.
31A-23b-211.   Exceptions to navigator licensing.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Negotiate" is as defined in Section 31A-23a-102.

(b)  "Sell" is as defined in Section 31A-23a-102.

(c)  "Solicit" is as defined in Section 31A-23a-102.

(2)  The commissioner may not require a license as a navigator of:

(a)  a person who is employed by or contracts with:

(i)  a health care facility that is licensed under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act, to assist an individual with enrollment in a public program or an application for premium subsidy; or

(ii)  the state, a political subdivision of the state, an entity of a political subdivision of the state, or a public school district to assist an individual with enrollment in a public program or an application for premium subsidy;

(b)  a federally qualified health center as defined by Section 1905(1)(2)(B) of the Social Security Act which assists an individual with enrollment in a public program or an application for premium subsidy;

(c)  a person licensed under Chapter 23a, Insurance Marketing-Licensing, Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries, if the person is licensed in the appropriate line of authority to sell, solicit, or negotiate accident and health insurance plans;

(d)  an officer, director, or employee of a navigator:

(i)  who does not receive compensation or commission from an insurer issuing an insurance contract, an agency administering a public program, an individual who enrolled in a public program or insurance product, or an exchange; and

(ii)  whose activities:

(A)  are executive, administrative, managerial, clerical, or a combination thereof;

(B)  only indirectly relate to the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance, or the enrollment in a public program offered through the exchange;

(C)  are in the capacity of a special agent or agency supervisor assisting an insurance producer or navigator;

(D)  are limited to providing technical advice and assistance to a licensed insurance producer or navigator; or

(E)  do not include the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance, or the enrollment in a public program; and

(e)  a person who does not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance and is not directly or indirectly compensated by an insurer issuing an insurance contract, an agency administering a public program, an individual who enrolled in a public program or insurance product, or an exchange, including:

(i)  an employer, association, officer, director, employee, or trustee of an employee trust plan who is engaged in the administration or operation of a program:

(A)  of employee benefits for the employer's or association's own employees or the employees of a subsidiary or affiliate of an employer or association; and

(B)  that involves the use of insurance issued by an insurer or enrollment in a public health plan on an exchange;

(ii)  an employee of an insurer or organization employed by an insurer who is engaging in the inspection, rating, or classification of risk, or the supervision of training of insurance producers; or

(iii)  an employee who counsels or advises the employee's employer with regard to the insurance interests of the employer, or a subsidiary or business affiliate of the employer.

(3)  The exemption from licensure under Subsections (2)(a) and (b) does not apply if a person described in Subsections (2)(a) and (b) enrolls a person in a private insurance plan.

(4)  The commissioner may by rule exempt a class of persons from the license requirement of Subsection 31A-23b-201(1) if:

(a)  the functions performed by the class of persons do not require:

(i)  special competence;

(ii)  special trustworthiness; or

(iii)  regulatory surveillance made possible by licensing; or

(b)  other existing safeguards make regulation unnecessary.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

